Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 11. Annual Registration Fees.

§ 50-73.66.
Annual registration fees to be assessed and collected by Commission; application of payment.

The Commission shall assess and collect the annual registration fees imposed by this chapter. When the Commission receives payment of a registration fee assessed against a domestic or a foreign limited partnership, such payment shall be applied against any unpaid registration fees previously assessed against such limited partnership, including any penalties incurred thereon, beginning with the assessment that has remained unpaid for the longest period of time.

History.

1985, c. 607.

§ 50-73.67.
Annual registration fees to be paid by domestic and foreign limited partnerships.

Every domestic limited partnership, and every foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in the Commonwealth, shall pay into the state treasury on or before October 1 in each year after the calendar year in which it was formed or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth an annual registration fee of $50, provided that the initial annual registration fee to be paid by a domestic limited partnership created by an entity conversion from a domestic stock corporation shall be due in the year after the calendar year in which the conversion became effective when the annual registration fee of the domestic stock corporation was paid for the calendar year in which the conversion became effective.The annual registration fee shall be imposed irrespective of any specific license tax or other tax or fee imposed by law upon the domestic or foreign limited partnership for the privilege of carrying on its business in the Commonwealth or upon its franchise, property, or receipts.

Each year, the Commission shall ascertain from its records each domestic limited partnership and each foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in the Commonwealth as of July 1 and, except as provided in subsection A, shall assess against each such limited partnership the annual registration fee herein imposed.

A statement of the assessment, when made, shall be forwarded by the clerk of the Commission to the Comptroller and to each domestic and foreign limited partnership.

A domestic or foreign limited partnership shall not be required to pay the annual registration fee assessed against it pursuant to subsection B in any year if (i) the Commission issues or files any of the following types of certificate or instrument and (ii) the certificate or instrument is effective on or before the annual registration fee due date:

A certificate of cancellation of existence for a domestic limited partnership;

A certificate of cancellation for a foreign limited partnership;

A certificate of merger or an authenticated copy of an instrument of merger for a domestic or foreign limited partnership that has merged into a surviving domestic limited partnership or other business entity or into a surviving foreign limited partnership or other business entity; or

An authenticated copy of an instrument of entity conversion for a foreign limited partnership that has converted into a different entity type.The Commission shall cancel the annual registration fee assessments specified in this subsection that remain unpaid.

Annual registration fee assessments that have been paid shall not be refunded.

The fees paid into the state treasury under this section and the fees collected under subsection B of §

50-73.17

shall be set aside and paid into the special fund created under §

13.1-775.1

, and shall be used only by the Commission as it deems necessary to defray the costs of the Commission and of the office of the clerk of the Commission in supervising, implementing, administering and enforcing the provisions of this chapter. The projected excess of fees collected over the costs of administration and enforcement so incurred shall be paid into the general fund prior to the close of each fiscal year, based on the unexpended balance of the special fund at the end of the prior fiscal year. An adjustment of this transfer amount to reflect actual fees collected shall occur during the first quarter of the succeeding fiscal year.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1991, c. 434; 1995, c. 621; 2002, c. 441; 2007, cc. 631, 810; 2013, c. 18; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 441 deleted “subdivisions 1, 2 and 3 of” preceding “subsection C” in the first sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 substituted “subsection B” for “subsection C” at the end of the first sentence in the second paragraph.

The 2007 amendment by c. 810, in the first paragraph, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth,” “October 1” for “September 1,” and “$50” for “fifty dollars”; and made a minor stylistic change in the second paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 18 designated the former provisions of the section as the first paragraph of subsection A and subsection F; added the second paragraph of subsection A and subsections B through E; and in the first paragraph of subsection A, substituted “each” for “every” twice.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A in the first paragraph, substituted “Every” for “Each” twice, and added the proviso at the end and in the second paragraph, inserted “domestic or foreign”; rewrote subsection D, which read: “Any domestic limited partnership that has ceased to exist in the Commonwealth because of the filing of a certificate of cancellation or any foreign limited partnership that has obtained a certificate of cancellation, effective on or before its annual registration fee due date pursuant to subsection A in any year, shall not be required to pay the annual registration fee for that year. Any domestic or foreign limited partnership that has merged, effective on or before its annual registration fee due date pursuant to subsection A in any year, into a surviving domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or partnership that files with the Commission an authenticated copy of the instrument of merger on or before such date shall not be required to pay the annual registration fee for that year. Any foreign limited partnership that has converted, effective on or before its annual registration fee due date pursuant to subsection A in any year, to a different entity type that files with the Commission an authenticated copy of the instrument of entity conversion on or before such date shall not be required to pay the annual registration fee for that year. The Commission shall cancel the annual registration fee assessments specified in this subsection that remain unpaid”; and in subsection E, inserted “Annual.” For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 50-73.68.
Repealed by Acts 2013, c. 18, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

50-73.68

, pertaining to assessment of annual registration fees and forwarding of statements, derived from Acts 1985, c. 607; 1995, c. 621.

§ 50-73.69.
Penalty for failure to timely pay annual registration fee.

Any domestic or any foreign limited partnership that fails to pay the annual registration fee into the state treasury within the time prescribed in §

50-73.67

shall incur a penalty of $25, which shall be added to the amount of the annual registration fee due. The penalty prescribed herein shall be in addition to any other penalty or liability imposed by law.

The Commission shall mail to each domestic and foreign limited partnership that fails to pay the annual registration fee within the time prescribed in §

50-73.67

notice of assessment of the penalty imposed herein and of the impending cancellation of its existence or certificate of registration, as the case may be. A domestic limited partnership whose certificate has been canceled pursuant to this section is dissolved upon cancellation and shall be wound up pursuant to Article 8 (§

50-73.49

et seq.) of this chapter.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1996, c. 255; 1998, c. 163; 2000, c. 52; 2004, cc. 274, 601; 2008, c. 586.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 52, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any domestic or foreign corporation, domestic or foreign limited liability company, or domestic or foreign limited partnership whose registered agent files a certificate of resignation with the State Corporation Commission pursuant to §§

13.1-636

,

13.1-765

,

13.1-835

,

13.1-927

,

13.1-1017

, or §

50-73.6

of the Code of Virginia on or after January 1, 2001.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 52 redesignated the former subsection B as subdivision B 1, and inserted subdivision B 2.
For applicability, see editor’s note.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274 substituted “$25” for “twenty-five dollars” in the first sentence of subsection A; substituted “31” for “thirty-one” in the first sentence of subdivision B 2; in subsection D, inserted the clause (i) designation and added clause (ii); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendment by c. 601 substituted “$25” for “twenty five dollars” in subsection A; substituted “31” for “thirty one” in the first sentence of subdivision B 2 and added subdivision B 3; substituted “five” for “two” in the first sentence of subsection D; and in the second sentence of subsection E, substituted “five” for “two” and inserted “or §

50-73.13

or §

50-73.58

.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 586, effective April 1, 2009, rewrote this section.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 50-73.70.
Payment of fees, fines, penalties, and interest prerequisite to Commission action; refunds.

The Commission shall not file or issue with respect to any domestic or foreign limited partnership any document or certificate specified in this chapter, except a statement of change pursuant to §

50-73.5

and a statement of resignation pursuant to §

50-73.6

, until all fees, fines, penalties, and interest assessed, imposed, charged, or to be collected by the Commission pursuant to this chapter or Title 12.1 have been paid by or on behalf of such limited partnership. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Commission may file or issue any document or certificate with respect to a domestic or foreign limited partnership that has been assessed an annual registration fee if the document or certificate is filed or issued with an effective date that is on or before the due date of the limited partnership’s annual registration fee payment in any year, provided that the Commission shall not issue a certificate of conversion with respect to a domestic limited partnership that will become a domestic stock corporation until the annual registration fee has been paid by or on behalf of the limited partnership.

The Commission shall have authority to certify to the Comptroller directing refund of any overpayment of a fee, or of any fee collected for a document that is not accepted for filing, at any time within one year from the date of its payment.

History.

1985, c. 607; 2002, c. 441; 2004, c. 316; 2006, c. 659; 2007, c. 810; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 441 inserted “fines, penalties, and interest assessed, imposed, charged or” following “fees,” substituted “pursuant to” for “under,” and inserted “or Title 12.1.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 316 added the subsection A designation and subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 659, in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted “any” following “domestic or,” substituted “document or certificate specified” for “certificate referred to,” and added “except a statement of change pursuant to §

50-73.5

and a statement of resignation pursuant to §

50-73.6

” and added the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 810 substituted “on or before” for “prior to” near the end of subsection A.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, added “provided that the Commission shall not issue a certificate of conversion with respect to a domestic limited partnership that will become a domestic stock corporation until the annual registration fee has been paid by or on behalf of the limited partnership” in subsection A. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

§ 50-73.71.
Collection by suit and of unpaid bills.

The provisions of §§

13.1-775.1

and

58.1-2814

, so far as they are applicable, shall apply to the annual registration fees and penalties imposed by this chapter.

History.

1985, c. 607.